Utah statutes.
23-13-15.   Hunting and Fishing Day.

In recognition of the substantial and continued contribution by hunters and fishermen toward the sound management of wildlife in Utah, the fourth Saturday of September of each year is hereby established as Utah State Hunting and Fishing Day.

